Utah statutes.
7-1-1003.   Intervention to challenge or stay order -- Burden on
governmental entity.
(1)  Notwithstanding any other law or rule of law, any person who is entitled
to notice of a court order under Section 7-1-1002 shall have the right to
intervene in any proceeding with respect to enforcement of the order to:
(a)  challenge the issuance of the order; or
(b)  stay compliance with the order.
(2)  Upon intervention, the burden shall be on the governmental entity
obtaining the order to show that there is reasonable cause for the issuance of
the order.
